src-fst-morphology-stems-adpositions.lexc.md
# Prepositions: 
Simple: le, ag, ar, etc.
Compound (Na Forainmneacha Réamhfhoclacha) Prepositional Pronouns (agam, agat...)
Emphatic Compound eg agamsa, uaimse, ...
E. Uí Dhonnchadha

- (1) New Irish Grammar by The Christian Brothers  
- (2) Gramadach na Gaeilge agus Litríocht na Gaeilge - An Caighdeán Oifigiúil
- (3) Foclóir Póca - An Gúm
- (4) Nuachúrsa Gaeilge na mBráithre Críostaí
- (5) Ó Dónaill Irish-English Dictionary

**LEXICON Prepositions**

SIMPLE PREPOSITIONS
theses are not preps only copula or conj
this "is" looks like "agus" to me ... removing the prep reading ...
should be subst except in Prep Cmpd - see below : maidir+Prep+Simp:maidir			#;
should be subst:  maille+Prep+Simp:maille			#; ! maille le = along with

COMPOUNDS: PREP + ARTICLE (an/na)

le does not combine with art: but becomes leis before "an"

trí does not combine with art: but becomes tríd before "an"

Hisrorical forms (bardic)

COMPOUNDS: PREP + POSS PRON (a/ár)

COMPOUNDS: PREP + REL. PART. (a/ar)

COMPOUND PREPOSITIONS: PREP + NOUN

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/adpositions.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-gle/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/adpositions.lexc)</small>
